Montana, session 2025, SB478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Requirement to pay certain medical costs -- definitions. (1) A
covered institution shall provide reimbursements to students for medical costs as described in this section.
(2) A student seeking payment of medical costs under this section shall submit to the covered
institution at which the student is or was enrolled a request for payment containing the following information:
(a) a record of covid-19 vaccination, including:
(i) the date of the vaccination; and
(ii) certification that the vaccination was acquired in order to comply with requirements of the
covered institution for attendance; and
(b) certification from a medical provider that, following the vaccination described in subsection
(2)(a), the student received a diagnosis of one or more of the following diseases:
(i) myocarditis;
(ii) pericarditis;
(iii) thrombosis with thrombocytopenia syndrome;
(iv) Guillain-Barre syndrome; or
(v) any other disease with a positive association with the covid-19 vaccine that the board of
regents of higher education determines to be warranted; and
(c) records of the medical costs for the student.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following terms apply:
(a) "Covered institution" means a public institution of postsecondary education governed,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 478

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 478.1
supervised, or coordinated by the board of regents of higher education.
(b) "Medical costs" means:
(i) costs associated with the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, or treatment of a disease described in
subsection (2)(b); and
(ii) any wages or income lost due to illness caused by a disease described in subsection (2)(b).
(c) "Student" means an individual who, for any amount of time, attends or attended, as applicable,
a covered institution after January 20, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 25, part 3, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 25, part 3, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 478